src/fst/stems/nouns_BASE_18748.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no

! This program is free software;you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.

! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! SORTERING
! $GTHOME/giella-core/devtools/lexc-giella-style.py -h = LexC Sorting = Sorterer stemsfiler. Skulle sortert også etter 1) kontinuasjonsleksikon, 2) finne duobletter, 3) rev-sort-rev -sortering.
! SORTERING SLUTT

!! # South Sámi nouns 
LEXICON NounRoot
!! ## The lexicon `@LEXNAME@`

!! This lexicon is the start of all noun lemmas. It splits the nouns in three
!! classes as follows:

! ! ```mermaid
! ! stateDiagram-v2
! ! direction LR ;
 0 FirstComponent ; !!= @LEXNAME@ --> @CONTLEX@
 0 HyphNouns      ; !!= @LEXNAME@ --> @CONTLEX@
 0 Noun           ; !!= @LEXNAME@ --> @CONTLEX@
! ! ```

LEXICON FirstComponent ! - disse skal helst ikke gå til R-lexicon, untatt de lemma som skal ha en separat form i sammensetninger.
! dette er lemma som bare opptrer først i sammensetninger:
! biejjh
! tjelm
! niejt
! aarph

aalth+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:aalth R ;
adhesjovne+N+Sem/Dummytag+Use/NG+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR:adhesions R ;
adhesjovne+N+Sem/Dummytag+Use/NG+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW:adhesjons R ;
adresse+N+Sem/Dummytag+Use/NG+Cmp/SgNom:adress R ;
akaasije+N+Sem/Dummytag:akasie R ;
aksijse+N+Sem/Dummytag+Use/NG+CmpN/SgN+Cmp/SgNom+OLang/NOB:aksise R ;
aluminiumfovlije+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:alumini^um#folie R ;
ananasse+N+Sem/Fruit+Use/NG+Cmp/SgNom:ananas R ;
!arabeere+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+OLang/NOB:araber R ; ! Kva er ein arabeer/arabear?
!arabeere+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR:arab R ;
aroma+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag+Use/NG+Cmp/SgNom+OLang/NOB:aroma R ;
arteriosklerovse+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR:arterio^skleros R ;
aterosklerovse+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR:atero^skleros R ;
auditovrije+N+Sem/Plc+Cmp/SgNom:auditorie R ;
aureomysijne+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:aureomycin R ;
avte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:avtelds R ;
avteld+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:avteld R ;
avtelh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:avtelh R ;
avtels+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:avtels R ;
baalka+N+Cmp/Attr+Sem/Route:baelkies R ; ! !baelkies+Sem/Dummytag:baelkie ATTR_S ; ! brukt i stedsnavn! 'baalka' - jfr. faelies, faala! - f.eks Baelkies-vaajja, Baelkiesvuemie, Baelkiesgyörte
balkånge+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:balkong R ;
ballånge+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+OLang/NOB:ballong R ;
faala+N+Cmp/Attr:faelies R ; !faelies+Sem/Dummytag:faelie ATTR_S ; ! brukes bare i sammensetninger.
hovr+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:hovr R ;
julev+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:julev R ;
laadth+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:laadth R ;
maadth+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR:maadth R ; ! maadtege
OECD-stuvdije+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+OLang/NOB+Use/NG:OECD-studie R ; ! RIKTIG Oppføring
orr+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:orr R ;
!roest+N+Sem/Dummytag:roest R ;
ruaksj+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:ruaksj R ; ! prefiks -
sjisjnje+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:sjisjnje R ;
!vuentiemie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:vuentiemie R ; !Check
xerograafe+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom+OLang/NOB:xero^graf R ;
åvte+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:åvtelds R ; ! bæjngolds // bæjngoeh
åvteld+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:åvteld R ;
åvtelh+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:åvtelh R ;
åvtels+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:åvtels R ; ! attr and cmp produktiv -

LEXICON Noun !!≈ ## **@CODE@**
!! Splitting nouns in NounNoPx, NounPx (with a P.Px.add
!! flag) and NounPxKin (with a P.Nom3Px.add flag)
                          NounNoPx  ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** = words in this noun lexicon do not get any possessive inflectionb
                @P.Px.add@ NounPx    ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** = these nouns do get possessive inflection, except for 3. person nominative, which is usually only used with kinship terms (see next)
                @P.Px.add@ NounPxKin ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** = these nouns get full possessive inflection, including 3. person nominative - except that the 3. person nominative has been removed in the South Sámi description. The reason for that change needs to be documented here.
! @P.Px.add@@P.Nom3Px.add@ NounPxKin ;

LEXICON NounPx
voesse+N+Sem/Ctain-clth:voess NIEJTE "säck, ryggsäck" ;
